Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB222.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.343, No.176), known as The Fiscal Code, is amended by adding an article to read:ARTICLE XVIII-BGRANT OVERSIGHTSUBARTICLE APRELIMINARY PROVISIONSSection 1801-B. Scope of article.This article relates to grant oversight.Section 1802-B. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Commonwealth agency." Any of the following:(1) The Governor's Office.(2) A department, board, commission, authority or other agency of the Commonwealth that is subject to the policy supervision and control of the Governor.(3) The Office of Lieutenant Governor.(4) An independent department.(5) An independent agency."Grant." As follows:(1) A commitment of money and programmatic authority by a Commonwealth agency serving as the grantor to an outside entity for the purpose of carrying out public policy or implementing program service delivery.(2) The term does not include a procurement in which the grantor receives specific goods or services for the grantor's 20250SB0222PN0171 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 direct benefit or use."Grantee." An outside entity that contracts with a Commonwealth agency to receive grant funding."Grantor." A Commonwealth agency administering a grant."Independent agency." As follows:(1) A board, commission, authority or other agency of the Commonwealth that is not subject to the policy supervision and control of the Governor.(2) The term does not include:(i) A court or agency of the unified judicial system.(ii) The General Assembly or an agency of the General Assembly."Independent department." Any of the following:(1) The Department of the Auditor General.(2) The Treasury Department.(3) The Office of Attorney General.(4) A board or commission of an entity under paragraph (1), (2) or (3)."Municipality." A county, city, borough, incorporated town or township."Outside entity." As follows:(1) A person that is not a Commonwealth agency.(2) The term includes the following:(i) An individual.(ii) A municipality.(iii) A school district.(iv) A nonprofit organization.(v) A service provider."Project." An activity, program or task that is funded 20250SB0222PN0171 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 through a grant.SUBARTICLE BREQUIREMENTS FOR GRANTSSection 1811-B. Applicability.This subarticle is subject to Subarticle C.Section 1812-B. Disclosure of additional funding sources.If money for a grant is paid by a Commonwealth agency to a grantee but the amount is insufficient to cover the total cost of the project and other money is being sought to fully fund the project, the grantee shall disclose to the Commonwealth agency the additional funding sources and identify the specific grant subproject or category to which Commonwealth grant money will be applied.Section 1813-B. Use of Commonwealth funds.Money provided by a Commonwealth agency for a grant to a grantee shall only be used after the grantee exhausts other sources of funding for the project that was the subject of the grant, unless the Commonwealth agency specifically waives this requirement in writing.Section 1814-B. Bonuses prohibited.(a) Prohibition.--A bonus to an individual or entity may not be paid with any part of grant money provided by a Commonwealth agency.(b) Penalty.--The payment of a bonus under subsection (a) shall automatically trigger the immediate repayment of the grant money.Section 1815-B. Monitoring and reporting.A grant award shall specify the following:(1) Regular monitoring by the Commonwealth agency providing the grant.20250SB0222PN0171 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) Reporting by the grantee to the Commonwealth agency providing the grant, at least on a semiannual basis, regarding expenditures, performance and progress associated with the grant.Section 1816-B. Specific purpose.Grant money that is not expended for the specific tasks for which the grant was awarded shall be returned to the Commonwealth, with interest, within 30 days of the final closeout audit regarding the grant.Section 1817-B. Remaining money.The following shall apply to money designated for a project, after the period for the grant has concluded or if the project has been completed:(1) If a grantee obtains money from a funding source other than a Commonwealth agency, after the payment of grant money by the Commonwealth agency, and if money paid by the Commonwealth agency remains unspent, the grantee shall reimburse the Commonwealth an amount equal to the money received from the other funding source, up to the amount of the grant provided by the Commonwealth agency, with interest.(2) If a grantee obtains money from a funding source other than a Commonwealth agency and that money remains unspent, the grantee shall pay the Commonwealth that unspent amount as a reimbursement of the grant money provided by the Commonwealth agency, up to the amount of the grant provided by the Commonwealth agency, with interest.SUBARTICLE CCOMPETITIVE GRANTSSection 1821-B. Scope of subarticle.(a) Competitive application process.--This subarticle shall 20250SB0222PN0171 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 apply to grants awarded by a Commonwealth agency through a competitive application process.(b) Excluded entities.--This subarticle shall not apply to the following:(1) A municipality.(2) A school district.(3) A community college.(4) An institution within the State System of Higher Education.(5) A State-related university.Section 1822-B. Contents of grant agreement.An agreement underlying a grant award shall contain the following:(1) A statement that the grantee agrees to repay the Commonwealth the balance of the grant money paid by the Commonwealth agency that is not expended by the grantee for the specific purpose for which the grant was awarded.(2) A statement that the grantee agrees, if the grantee obtains money for the project from a funding source other than the Commonwealth agency after payment of the grant money by the Commonwealth agency, to reimburse the Commonwealth an amount equal to the money received from the other funding source. The amount shall not exceed the amount of the grant provided by the Commonwealth agency but shall include interest.(3) A statement that the grantee agrees, if the Commonwealth agency determines that the grantee misrepresented the grantee's efforts to obtain funding as specified under section 1823-B(1)(ii), to repay the Commonwealth the full amount of the grant plus a 10% penalty 20250SB0222PN0171 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 on the face amount of the grant.(4) A statement that the grantee agrees that the Commonwealth agency may set off the amount of any State tax liability or other obligation of the grantee or its subsidiaries to the Commonwealth against any payments due to the grantee under the grant.(5) Clear procedures for the Commonwealth agency to enforce the agreement and obtain repayment in light of a breach of the agreement or failure of the grantee to comply with this article.Section 1823-B. Payment to grantee.A grant may not be paid by a Commonwealth agency to a grantee unless:(1) The grantee has demonstrated the following to the satisfaction of the Commonwealth agency through written documentation:(i) That the grantee has exercised due diligence in making reasonable efforts to obtain funding from other sources for the expenses for which the grant is being requested.(ii) The results of the grantee's efforts under subparagraph (i).(iii) The projected total cost of the project that is subject to the grant.(2) The grantee has acted in accordance with the conditions specified under section 1822-B(1), (2), (3) and (4).Section 1824-B. Competitive application process.Subject to 62 Pa.C.S. (relating to procurement) and unless otherwise provided in enabling legislation for the allocation of 20250SB0222PN0171 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 grants, an award of a grant by a Commonwealth agency that will involve a project for construction, production, machinery, equipment or services exceeding $10,000 shall be made only after a competitive application process.Section 1825-B. Misrepresentation.If a Commonwealth agency determines that a grantee misrepresented the grantee's efforts to obtain funding as provided under section 1823-B(1)(ii), the grantee shall repay the Commonwealth the full amount of the grant plus a 10% penalty on the face amount of the grant.Section 2. This act shall apply to an agreement underlying a grant award that is made on or after the effective date of this section.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0222PN0171 - 8 - 1234567891011121314